Utah statutes.
58-53-603.   Seal -- Authorized use.
A landscape architect may only affix the landscape architect's seal to a site
plan when the site plan:
(1)  was personally prepared by the landscape architect;
(2)  was prepared by an employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter under the
supervision of a licensee, provided the licensee or a principal affixing the
seal assumes responsibility;
(3)  was prepared by a licensed landscape architect in this state or any other
state provided that the licensee in this state affixing the seal:
(a)  performs a thorough review of all work for compliance with all applicable
laws and rules and the standards of the profession; and
(b)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final site plan:
(i)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or
(ii)  to a client who has contracted with a landscape architect for the
production of a site plan, when the landscape architect represents, or could
reasonably expect the client to consider, the site plan to be complete and
final;
(4)  was prepared by a person exempt from licensure as a landscape architect,
provided that the licensee in this state affixing the seal:
(a)  performs a thorough review for compliance with all applicable laws and
rules and the standards of the profession; and
(b)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final site plan:
(i)  to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; or
(ii)  to a client who has contracted with a landscape architect for the
production of a site plan, when the landscape architect represents, or could
reasonably expect the client to consider, the site plan to be complete and
final; or
(5)  meets any additional requirements established by rule by the division in
collaboration with the board.
